Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3336.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 62 O.S. 2021, Section 34.11.1, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 193, O.S.L. 2024 (62 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 34.11.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 34.11.1. A. There is hereby created the position of
Chief Information Officer who shall be appointed by the Governor.
The Chief Information Officer, in addition to having authority over
the Information Services Division of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services, shall also serve as Secretary of Information
Technology and Telecommunications or successor cabinet position and
shall have jurisdictional areas of responsibility related to
information technology and telecommunications systems of all state
agencies as provided for in state law. The salary of the Chief
Req. No. 14538 Page 1

Info rmation Officer shall not be less than One Hundred Thirty
Thousand Dollars ($130,000.00) or more than One Hundred Sixty
Thousand Dollars ($160,000.00).
B. Any person appointed to the position of Chief Information
Officer shall meet the following eligibility requirements:
1. A baccalaureate degree in Computer Information Systems,
Information Systems or Technology Management, Business
Administration, Finance, or other similar degree;
2. A minimum of ten (10) years of professional experience with
responsibilities for management and support of information systems
and information technology, including seven (7) years of direct
management of a major information technology operation;
3. Familiarity with local and wide-area network design,
implementation, and operation;
4. Experience with data and voice convergence service
offerings;
5. Experience in developing technology budgets;
6. Experience in developing requests for proposal and
administering the bid process;
7. Experience managing professional staff, teams, and
consultants;
8. Knowledge of telecommunications operations;


Req. No. 14538 Page 2

9. Ability to develop and set strategic direction for
information technology and telecommunications and to manage daily
development and operations functions;
10. An effective communicator who is able to build consensus;
11. Ability to analyze and resolve complex issues, both logical
and interpersonal;
12. Effective verbal and written communications skills and
effective presentation skills, geared toward coordination and
education;
13. Ability to negotiate and defuse conflict; and
14. A self-motivator, independent, cooperative, flexible and
creative.
C. The salary and any other expenses for the Chief Information
Officer shall be budgeted as a separate line item through the Office
of Management and Enterprise Services. The operating expenses of
the Information Services Division shall be set by the Chief
Information Officer and shall be budgeted as a separate line item
through the Office of Management and Enterprise Services. The
Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall provide adequate
office space, equipment and support necessary to enable the Chief
Information Officer to carry out the information technology and
telecommunications duties and responsibilities of the Chief
Information Officer and the Information Services Division.

Req. No. 14538 Page 3

D. 1. Within twelve (12) months of appointment, the first
Chief Information Officer shall complete an assessment, which shall
be modified annually pursuant to Section 35.5 of this title, of the
implementation of the transfer, coordination, and modernization of
all information technology and telecommunication systems of all
state agencies in the state as provided for in the Oklahoma
Information Services Act. The assessment shall include the
information technology and telecommunications systems of all
institutions within The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education,
the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education and the
telecommunications network known as OneNet as assembled and
submitted by the Oklahoma Higher Education Chief Information
Officer, as designated by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education.
2. Within twelve (12) months of appointment, the first Chief
Information Officer shall issue a report setting out a plan of
action which will include the following:
a. define the shared service model organization structure
and the reporting relationship of the recommended
organization,
b. the implementation of an information technology and
telecommunications shared services model that defines
the statewide infrastructure environment needed by
most state agencies that is not specific to individual
Req. No. 14538 Page 4

agencies and the shared applications that are utilized
across multiple agencies,
c. define the services that shall be in the shared
services model under the control of the Information
Services Division of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services,
d. define the roadmap to implement the proposed shared
services model. The roadmap shall include
recommendations on the transfer, coordination, and
modernization of all information technology and
telecommunication systems of all the state agencies in
the state,
e. recommendations on the reallocation of information
technology and telecommunication resources and
personnel,
f. a cost benefit analysis to support the recommendations
on the reallocation of information technology and
telecommunication resources and personnel,
g. a calculation of the net savings realized through the
reallocation and consolidation of information
technology and telecommunication resources and
personnel after compensating for the cost of
contracting with a private consultant as authorized in
paragraph 4 of this subsection, implementing the plan
Req. No. 14538 Page 5

of action, and ongoing costs of the Information
Services Division of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services, and
h. the information required in subsection B of Section
35.5 of this title.
3. The plan of action report shall be presented to the
Governor, Speaker of the Oklahoma House of Representatives, and the
President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State Senate.
4. The Chief Information Officer may contract with a private
consultant or consultants to assist in the assessment and
development of the plan of action report as required in this
subsection.
E. The Chief Information Officer shall be authorized to employ
personnel, fix the duties and compensation of the personnel, not
otherwise prescribed by law, and otherwise direct the work of the
personnel in performing the function and accomplishing the purposes
of the Information Services Division of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services.
F. The Information Services Division of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services shall be responsible for the
following duties:
1. Formulate and implement the information technology strategy
for all state agencies;

Req. No. 14538 Page 6

2. Define, design, and implement a shared services statewide
infrastructure and application environment for information
technology and telecommunications for all state agencies;
3. Direct the development and operation of a scalable
telecommunications infrastructure that supports data and voice
communications reliability, integrity, and security;
4. Supervise the applications development process for those
applications that are utilized across multiple agencies;
5. Provide direction for the professional development of
information technology staff of state agencies and oversee the
professional development of the staff of the Information Services
Division of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services;
6. Evaluate all technology and telecommunication investment
choices for all state agencies;
7. Create a plan to ensure alignment of current systems, tools,
and processes with the strategic information technology plan for all
state agencies;
8. Set direction and provide oversight for the support and
continuous upgrading of the current information technology and
telecommunication infrastructure in the state in support of enhanced
reliability, user service levels, and security;
9. Direct the development, implementation, and management of
appropriate standards, policies and procedures to ensure the success
of state information technology and telecommunication initiatives;
Req. No. 14538 Page 7

10. Recruit, hire and transfer the required technical staff in
the Information Services Division of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services to support the services provided by the Division
and the execution of the strategic information technology plan;
11. Establish, maintain, and enforce information technology and
telecommunication standards;
12. Delegate, coordinate, and review all work to ensure quality
and efficient operation of the Information Services Division of the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services;
13. Create and implement a communication plan that disseminates
pertinent information to state agencies on standards, policies,
procedures, service levels, project status, and other important
information to customers of the Information Services Division of the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services and provide for agency
feedback and performance evaluation by customers of the Division;
14. Develop and implement training programs for state agencies
using the shared services of the Information Services Division of
the Office of Management and Enterprise Services and recommend
training programs to state agencies on information technology and
telecommunication systems, products and procedures;
15. Provide counseling, performance evaluation, training,
motivation, discipline, and assign duties for employees of the
Information Services Division of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services;
Req. No. 14538 Page 8

16. For all state agencies, approve the purchasing of all
information technology and telecommunication services and approve
the purchase of any information technology and telecommunication
product except the following:
a. a purchase less than or equal to Five Thousand Dollars
($5,000.00) if such product is purchased using a state
purchase card and the product is listed on either the
Approved Hardware or Approved Software list located on
the Office of Management and Enterprise Services
website, or
b. a purchase over Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) and
less than or equal to Twenty-five Thousand Dollars
($25,000.00) if such product is purchased using a
state purchase card, the product is listed on an
information technology or telecommunications statewide
contract, and the product is listed on either the
Approved Hardware or Approved Software list located on
the Office of Management and Enterprise Services
website;
17. Develop and enforce an overall infrastructure architecture
strategy and associated roadmaps for desktop, network, server,
storage, and statewide management systems for state agencies;
18. Effectively manage the design, implementation and support
of complex, highly available infrastructure to ensure optimal
Req. No. 14538 Page 9

perf ormance, on-time delivery of features, and new products, and
scalable growth;
19. Define and implement a governance model for requesting
services and monitoring service level metrics for all shared
services; and
20. Create the budget for the Information Services Division of
the Office of Management and Enterprise Services to be submitted to
the Legislature each year.
G. The State Governmental Technology Applications Review Board
shall provide ongoing oversight of the implementation of the plan of
action required in subsection D of this section. Any proposed
amendments to the plan of action shall be approved by the Board
prior to adoption.
H. 1. The Chief Information Officer shall act as the
Information Technology and Telecommunications Purchasing Director
for all state agencies and shall be responsible for the procurement
of all information technology and telecommunication software,
hardware, equipment, peripheral devices, maintenance, consulting
services, high technology systems, and other related information
technology, data processing, telecommunication and related
peripherals and services for all state agencies. The Chief
Information Officer shall establish, implement, and enforce policies
and procedures for the procurement of information technology and
telecommunication software, hardware, equipment, peripheral devices,
Req. No. 14538 Page 10

main tenance, consulting services, high technology systems, and other
related information technology, data processing, telecommunication
and related peripherals and services by purchase, lease-purchase,
lease with option to purchase, lease and rental for all state
agencies. The procurement policies and procedures established by
the Chief Information Officer shall be consistent with The Oklahoma
Central Purchasing Act.
2. The Chief Information Officer, or any employee or agent of
the Chief Information Officer acting within the scope of delegated
authority, shall have the same power and authority regarding the
procurement of all information technology and telecommunication
products and services as outlined in paragraph 1 of this subsection
for all state agencies as the State Purchasing Director has for all
acquisitions used or consumed by state agencies as established in
The Oklahoma Central Purchasing Act. Such authority shall,
consistent with the authority granted to the State Purchasing
Director pursuant to Section 85.10 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, include the power to designate financial or proprietary
information submitted by a bidder confidential and reject all
requests to disclose the information so designated, if the Chief
Information Officer requires the bidder to submit the financial or
proprietary information with a bid, proposal, or quotation.
I. The Information Services Division of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services and the Chief Information Officer
Req. No. 14538 Page 11

shal l be subject to the Oklahoma Central Purchasing Act for the
approval and purchase of all equipment, products, and services and
shall also be subject to the requirements of the Public Competitive
Bidding Act of 1974, the Oklahoma Lighting Energy Conservation Act
and the Public Building Construction and Planning Act. The Chief
Information Officer shall be authorized to delegate all or some of
the procurement of information technology and telecommunication
products and services and construction of facilities and
telecommunication networks to another state entity if the Chief
Information Officer determines it to be cost-effective and in the
best interest of the state. The Chief Information Officer shall
have authority to designate information technology and
telecommunication contracts as statewide contracts and mandatory
statewide contracts pursuant to Section 85.5 of Title 74 of the
Oklahoma Statutes and to negotiate consolidation contracts,
enterprise agreements and high technology systems contracts. Any
contract entered into by a state agency for which the Chief
Information Officer has not acted as the Information Technology and
Telecommunications Purchasing Director as required in this
subsection or subsection H of this section, shall be deemed to be
unenforceable and the Office of Management and Enterprise Services
shall not process any claim associated with the provisions thereof.
J. The Chief Information Officer shall establish, implement,
and enforce policies and procedure for the development and
Req. No. 14538 Page 12

proc urement of an interoperable radio communications system for
state agencies. The Chief Information Officer shall work with local
governmental entities in developing the interoperable radio
communications system.
K. The Chief Information Officer shall develop and implement a
plan to utilize open source technology and products for the
information technology and telecommunication systems of all state
agencies.
L. All state agencies and authorities of this state and all
officers and employees of those entities shall work and cooperate
with and lend assistance to the Chief Information Officer and the
Information Services Division of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services and provide any and all information requested by
the Chief Information Officer.
M. The Chief Information Officer shall prepare an annual report
detailing the ongoing net saving attributable to the reallocation
and consolidation of information technology and telecommunication
resources and personnel and shall submit the report to the Governor,
the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of Representatives, and the
President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State Senate.
N. For purposes of the Oklahoma Information Services Act,
unless otherwise provided for, "state agencies" shall include any
office, officer, bureau, board, commission, counsel, unit, division,
body, authority or institution of the executive branch of state
Req. No. 14538 Page 13

gove rnment, whether elected or appointed; provided, except with
respect to the provisions of subsection D of this section, the term
"state agencies" shall not include institutions within The Oklahoma
State System of Higher Education, the Oklahoma State Regents for
Higher Education and the telecommunications network known as OneNet.
O. As used in this section:
1. "High technology system" means advanced technological
equipment, software, communication lines, and services for the
processing, storing, and retrieval of information by a state agency;
2. "Consolidation contract" means a contract for several state
or public agencies for the purpose of purchasing information
technology and telecommunication goods and services; and
3. "Enterprise agreement" means an agreement for information
technology or telecommunication goods and services with a supplier
who manufactures, develops and designs products and provides
services that are used by one or more state agencies.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14538 MJ 12/10/25





Req. No. 14538 Page 14